District of Columbia statutes.
42-3112

Violation of injunction or abatement order.

(a)

A violation of any court order issued under this chapter is punishable as a contempt of court.

(b)

Upon finding that a defendant has willfully violated an order issued under this chapter, the court may issue any additional orders necessary to abate the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance.

(c)

Upon motion, the court may vacate an order or judgment of abatement if the owner of the property satisfies the court that the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance has been abated for 90 days prior to the motion, corrects all housing code and health code violations on the property, and deposits a bond in an amount to be determined by the court, which shall be in an amount reasonably calculated to ensure continued abatement of the nuisance. Any bond posted under this subsection shall be forfeited immediately if the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance recurs during the 2-year period following the date on which an order under this section is entered. At the close of 2 years following the date on which an order under this section is entered, the bond shall be returned.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 13, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-3312.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.